District of Columbia statutes.
36-130

Prosecutions; penalties.

The violation of any of the provisions of this subchapter shall be a misdemeanor, and prosecutions for violations of this subchapter shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia. Upon conviction of a violation of the provisions of this subchapter the penalty shall be a fine of not more than $50 for the 1st offense and a fine of not more than $100 for the 2nd and each subsequent offense.

History

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 811, ch. 737, § 10
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)

Cross References

Deceptive imitation of goods, criminal penalty, see § 22-1502.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 48-210.
1973 Ed., § 48-210.